Washington statutes.
RCW 18.74.090

False advertising—Use of name and words—License required—Prosecutions of violations.

(1) A person who is not licensed with the secretary of health as a physical therapist under the requirements of this chapter shall not represent him or herself as being so licensed and shall not use in connection with his or her name the words or letters "P.T.", "R.P.T.", "L.P.T.", "physical therapy", "physiotherapy", "physical therapist" or "physiotherapist", or any other letters, words, signs, numbers, or insignia indicating or implying that he or she is a physical therapist. No person may practice physical therapy without first having a valid license. Nothing in this chapter prohibits any person licensed in this state under any other act from engaging in the practice for which he or she is licensed. It shall be the duty of the prosecuting attorney of each county to prosecute all cases involving a violation of this chapter arising within his or her county. The attorney general may assist in such prosecution and shall appear at all hearings when requested to do so by the board.

(2) No person assisting in the practice of physical therapy may use the title "physical therapist assistant," the letters "PTA," or any other words, abbreviations, or insignia in connection with his or her name to indicate or imply, directly or indirectly, that he or she is a physical therapist assistant without being licensed in accordance with this chapter as a physical therapist assistant.

(3) Subsections (1) and (2) of this section do not apply to an individual who is authorized to practice as a physical therapist or work as a physical therapist assistant by compact privilege as defined in RCW 18.74.500.

[ 2017 c 108 s 5; 2007 c 98 s 10; 1991 c 3 s 181; 1987 c 150 s 48; 1986 c 259 s 125; 1983 c 116 s 18; 1961 c 64 s 8; 1949 c 239 s 9; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 10163-9.]

NOTES:

Severability—1987 c 150: See RCW 18.122.901.

Severability—1986 c 259: See note following RCW 18.130.010.

False advertising: Chapter 9.04 RCW.